Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.200

Fraud or misrepresentation in obtaining or maintaining a license—Penalty.

A person who attempts to obtain, obtains, or attempts to maintain a license by willful misrepresentation or fraudulent representation is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1997 c 392 s 517; 1986 c 259 s 12; 1984 c 279 s 20.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Part headings and captions not law—1997 c 392: See notes following RCW 74.39A.009.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.